Hawaii statutes.
§658A-4 Effect of agreement to arbitrate;
nonwaivable provisions. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections
(b) and (c), a party to an agreement to arbitrate or to an arbitration
proceeding may waive, or the parties may vary the effect of, the requirements
of this chapter to the extent permitted by law.

(b) Before a controversy arises that is
subject to an agreement to arbitrate, a party to the agreement shall not:

(1) Waive or agree to vary the effect of the
requirements of section 658A-5(a), 658A-6(a), 658A-8, 658A-17(a), 658A-17(b),
658A-26, or 658A-28;

(2) Agree to unreasonably restrict the right under
section 658A-9 to notice of the initiation of an arbitration proceeding;

(3) Agree to unreasonably restrict the right under
section 658A-12 to disclosure of any facts by a neutral arbitrator; or

(4) Waive the right under section 658A-16 of a party
to an agreement to arbitrate to be represented by a lawyer at any proceeding or
hearing under this chapter, but an employer and a labor organization may waive
the right to representation by a lawyer in a labor arbitration.

(c) A party to an agreement to arbitrate or
arbitration proceeding shall not waive, or the parties shall not vary the
effect of, the requirements of this section or section 658A-3(a) or (c),
658A-7, 658A-14, 658A-18, 658A-20(d) or (e), 658A-22, 658A-23, 658A-24,
658A-25(a) or (b), or 658A-29. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 16, §27]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next